Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-3308
Provisions of law governing vehicles and systems; limit on state and political subdivisions.

(1) Automated-driving-system-equipped vehicles and automated driving systems are governed exclusively by sections 60-3301 to 60-3311. The department is the sole and exclusive state agency that may implement sections 60-3301 to 60-3311.

(2) The state or any political subdivision shall not impose requirements, including performance standards, specific to the operation of automated-driving-system-equipped vehicles, automated driving systems, or on-demand driverless-capable vehicle networks in addition to the requirements of sections 60-3301 to 60-3311.

(3) The state or any political subdivision thereof shall not impose a tax or other requirements on an automated-driving-system-equipped vehicle, an automated driving system, or an on-demand driverless-capable vehicle network, where such tax or other requirements relate specifically to the operation of automated-driving-system-equipped vehicles.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 8.